Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 49

Enforcement of Mortgages, Deeds of Trust, and Vendors' Liens

Cross References.

Loans secured by liens on agricultural lands, §23-32-203.

Local actions, §16-60-102.

Preservation of mortgaged property, appointment of receiver, §16-117-208.

Statutory foreclosures, §18-50-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1899, No. 153, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1901, No. 158, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1911, No. 260, § 2: May 10, 1911. Emergency declared.

Acts 1935, No. 36, § 5: approved Feb. 15, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby ascertained and declared that restrictions imposed by existing laws relative to notes secured by vendor's lien are tending to hinder and delay the alienation of real property in Arkansas and, therefore, an alteration of the present law being necessary for the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1973, No. 604, § 4: Apr. 5, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of Section 1 of Act No. 260 of 1911, relating to the methods of giving notice that payment has been made upon an existing indebtedness are at this time inadequate and should be enlarged, as the present provisions for the giving of such notice are unduly restrictive, are a deterrent to the obtaining of financing for agricultural, commercial and industrial purposes in the State of Arkansas and that it is immediately necessary to correct this undesirable situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

18-49-101. Limitation of actions.

(a)

In suits to foreclose or enforce mortgages, deeds of trust, or vendor's liens, it shall be sufficient defense that they have not been brought within the period of limitation prescribed by law for a suit on the debt or liability for the security of which they were given.

(b)

When any payment is made on any existing indebtedness, before it is barred by the statute of limitations, the payment shall not operate to revive the debts or to extend the operations of the statute of limitations, with reference thereto, so far as it affects the rights of judgment lienholders and judgment creditors and third parties, unless the mortgagee, trustee, or beneficiary shall, prior to the expiration of the period of the statute of limitation, execute, acknowledge, and record a written instrument reflecting the amount and date of payments made or shall endorse a memorandum of the payment with date thereof on the margin of the record where the instrument is recorded, and the endorsement shall be attested and dated by the clerk.

(c)(1)

In all cases in which an indebtedness is secured by any mortgage, deed of trust, or instrument in which a vendor's lien is retained, the mortgage, deed of trust, or vendor's lien may be enforced or foreclosed at any time within the period prescribed by law for foreclosing mortgages or deeds of trust so far as the property mentioned or described in the deed of trust, mortgage, or other instrument is concerned.

(2)

However, no claim or debt against the estate of a dead person shall be probated against the estate, whether secured by mortgage, deed of trust, or instrument retaining a vendor's lien, or not, except within the time prescribed by law for probating claims against estates.

(d)(1)

The holder of a vendor's lien, whether as the original beneficiary or as the assignee or transferee thereof, must note on the margin of the record where the vendor's lien is recorded payments relative to the indebtedness secured thereby.

(2)

If the payments are not noted on the margin of the record, then the debt shall become barred, as to third parties, after five (5) years from the maturity of the indebtedness or after five (5) years from the date of the last payment, if any, which may be noted on the margin of the record, thereby subjecting evidences of indebtedness secured by vendor's lien to the same provisions and limitations provided by law in connection with evidences of indebtedness secured by mortgages or deeds of trust.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 260, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 7408; Acts 1935, No. 36, §§ 1, 2; 1937, No. 370, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 9465, 9466; Acts 1973, No. 604, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-1103, 51-1104.

Cross References.

Agreements extending maturity date, §18-40-103.

18-49-102. Defense of payment or setoff.

(a)

In any action in a justice court or circuit court of this state in which it is attempted to foreclose any mortgage or deed of trust or to replevy, under a mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument any personal property, the defendant in the action shall have the right to prove or show any payment or setoff under the mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument.

(b)

Judgment shall be rendered for the property or the balance due thereon, and the defendant may pay the judgment for the balance due and costs within ten (10) days and satisfy the judgment and retain the property.

History.

Acts 1901, No. 158, § 1, p. 303; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7410, 8654a; Pope's Dig., §§ 9468, 11388; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1102.

18-49-103. Judgment.

(a)

It shall not be necessary in any action upon a mortgage or lien to enter an interlocutory judgment or give time for the payment of money, or for doing any other act. In such cases, final judgment may be given in the first instance.

(b)

In the foreclosure of a mortgage, a sale of the mortgaged property shall be ordered in all cases.

(c)

In an action on a mortgage or lien, the judgment may be rendered for the sale of the property and for the recovery of the debt against the defendant personally.

(d)

Whenever a mortgagee reasonably believes that mortgaged property has or will be affected by a release or threatened release of any hazardous substance including, but not limited to, those defined by 42 U.S.C. § 9601(14) and (22), or §8-7-403(a)(8) [repealed], or §8-7-503, the mortgagee may proceed against the mortgagor personally to recover the debt, without need to first seek a sale of the mortgaged property.

History.

Civil Code, §§ 405, 406, 408; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6240-6242; Pope's Dig., §§ 8196-8198, 9474-9476; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-1105, 51-1106, 51-1108; Acts 1989, No. 260, § 1.

18-49-104. Sale of property under court order and publication of notice of sales.

(a)(1)

Sales of personal property made by order of the court shall be on a credit of three (3) months.

(2)

Sales of real property made by court order shall be on a credit of not less than three (3) months nor more than six (6) months, or on installments equivalent to not more than four (4) months' credit on the whole, to be determined by the court.

(b)(1)

In all sales on credit, the purchaser shall execute a bond, with good surety, to be approved by the person making the sale, and the bond shall have the force of a judgment.

(2)

In sales of real property, a lien shall be retained on the property for its price.

(c)(1)

The mortgagee, trustee, or vendor shall publish a notice of the sale in a newspaper published and having a general circulation in the county in which the property is situated or, if this is not available, then in a newspaper of general statewide daily publication one (1) time.

(2)

The publication shall be at least ten (10) days prior to the sale.

History.

Civil Code, § 407; C. & M. Dig., § 6243; Pope's Dig., §§ 8199, 9477; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1109; Acts 1997, No. 1190, § 1.

18-49-105. Proceeds of sale insufficient.

If the whole of mortgaged property does not sell for a sum sufficient to satisfy the amount due, an execution may be issued against the defendant as on ordinary judgments.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 101, § 17; C. & M. Dig., § 6244; Pope's Dig., §§ 8200, 9478; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1110.

18-49-106. Redemption of real property.

(a)(1)

In all cases where real property is sold under an order or decree of the circuit court or a court exercising circuit jurisdiction in the foreclosure of mortgages and deeds of trust, the mortgagor or his or her heirs or legal representatives shall have the right to redeem the property so sold.

(2)

This may be done at any time within one (1) year from the date of sale, by the payment of the amount for which the property was sold, together with interest thereon, at the rate borne by the decree or judgment, and the cost of foreclosure and sale.

(b)

The mortgagor may waive the right of redemption in the mortgage or deed of trust so executed and foreclosed.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 153, § 1, p. 279; C. & M. Dig., § 7411; Pope's Dig., § 9473; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1111.

18-49-107. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning sale under power in mortgage or deed of trust, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 53, § 17. The section was derived from Acts 1879, No. 71, §§ 1, 2, p. 94; 1883, No. 88, § 1, p. 157; 1891, No. 119, § 1, p. 198; 1895, No. 3, § 1, p. 4; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7404-7407; Pope's Dig., §§ 9461-9464; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-1112—51-1114. For current law, see §18-50-101 et seq.